Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3543.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 1-102, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 329, O.S.L. 2023 (26 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 1-102), is amended to read as follows:

Req. No. 16022 Page 1

Section 1-102. A. A Primary Election shall be held on the
third Tuesday in June March of each even-numbered year, at which
time each political party recognized by the laws of this state shall
nominate its candidates for the offices to be filled at the next
succeeding General Election unless otherwise provided by law. No
candidate's name shall be printed upon the General Election ballot
unless such candidate shall have been nominated as herein provided,
unless otherwise provided by law; provided further that this
provision shall not exclude the right of a nonpartisan candidate to
have his or her name printed upon the General Election ballots. No
county, municipality or school district shall schedule an election
on any date during the twenty (20) days immediately preceding the
date of any such primary election.
B. A Primary Election shall be held on the third Tuesday in
June of each even-numbered presidential election year for any newly
recognized parties that were not recognized in time to select a
candidate at the Primary Election to be held on the third Tuesday in
March of that year.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 5-110, as
amended by Section 3, Chapter 329, O.S.L. 2023 (26 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 5-110), is amended to read as follows:
Section 5-110. A. Declarations of Candidacy provided herein
must be filed with the secretary of the appropriate election board
no earlier than 8:00 a.m. on the first Monday of December of any
Req. No. 16022 Page 2

odd- numbered year and no later than 5:00 p.m. on the next succeeding
Wednesday.
B. For newly recognized political parties formed pursuant to
the provisions of Section 1-108 of this title, Declarations of
Candidacy provided herein must be filed with the secretary of the
appropriate election board no earlier than 8:00 a.m. on the first
Wednesday of April of any even-numbered year and no later than 5:00
p.m. on the next succeeding Friday.
C. Such Declarations of Candidacy may be transmitted by United
States mail, but in no event shall the secretary of any election
board accept such Declarations after the time prescribed by law.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 5-119, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 5-119. The petition must be filed no later than 5:00
p.m. on the second business day following the close of the filing
period during which the candidate filed.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 8-103, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 8-103. A. 1. The county election board secretary
shall certify a list of successful candidates for county offices and
shall provide Certificates of Election to the same following the
General Election, except that; and
2. Provided, Certificates of Election may be issued to
unopposed candidates after 5 p.m. on the second day following the
Req. No. 16022 Page 3

clos e of the filing period for new political parties described in
subsection B of section 5-110 of this title.
B. The State Election Board secretary shall certify a list of
successful candidates for offices for which the Board secretary
accepts filings of Declarations of Candidacy and shall provide
Certificates of Election to the same following the General Election,
except that Certificates of Election may be issued to unopposed
candidates after 5 p.m. on the second day following the close of the
filing period for new political parties described in subsection B of
section 5-110 of this title.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16022 MJ 02/04/26











Req. No. 16022 Page 4